Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.090

Stock issuance.

Except as otherwise provided in RCW 18.100.118, no professional corporation organized under the provisions of this chapter may issue any of its capital stock to anyone other than the trustee of a qualified trust or an individual who is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same specific professional services within this or any other state as those for which the corporation was incorporated.

[ 1998 c 293 s 3; 1997 c 18 s 2; 1983 c 51 s 4; 1969 c 122 s 9.]